test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_viissad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - viiššâđ: # MLO, checked
    viiššâđ+V+Inf: [viiššâđ, viššâđ]
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viišâm
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viišah
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: višá
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viššeen
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: višâvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viiššâv
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viiššâp
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: višâvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: višeh
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viiššim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viišših
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viišâi
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viišáim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viišáid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viišáin
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viišâim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viišâid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viššii
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: višâččim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: višâččih
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: višâččij
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: višâččáim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: višâččáid
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: višâččáin
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: višâččijm
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: višâččijd
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: višâččii
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viišeem
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viišeeh
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viišâš
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: višâžeen
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viišâšvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: višâžává
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: višâžep
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viišâšvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: višâžeh
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viišâ
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: višos
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: viššoon
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: viššee
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viššoos
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viššoop
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [viiššâđ, viššâđ] 
    viiššâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viššoos
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viišâ
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viiššâm
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: višâččii
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: viišii
    viiššâđ+V+PrsPrc: viššee
    viiššâđ+V+PrfPrc: viiššâm # viššâm
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Nom: [viiššâm, viššâm]
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ess: višâmin
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Loc: višâmist
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ill: višâmân
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Com: višâdijn
    viiššâđ+V+VAbess: višâhánnáá
